apertium-hun-eng.hun.dix
    <pardef n="poss-macska">
      <e><p><l>á</l><r></r></p><par n="poss-123ss"/><par n="case-ház"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ája</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p><par n="case-ház"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ánk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p><par n="case-ház"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ájuk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p><par n="case-ház"/></e>
      <e><p><l>á</l><r></r></p><par n="poss-123sp"/><par n="case-ház"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ház__n">
      <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p><par n="poss-ház"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p><par n="case-ház"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kert__n">
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p><par n="case-kert"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/éz__n">
      <e><p><l>éz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="idő__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="macsk/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>a<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="poss-macska"/></e>
      <e><p><l>á</l><r>a<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="case-ház"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="v/íz__n">
      <e><p><l>íz</l><r>íz<s n="n"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hang__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="húg__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   

    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="case-prop">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>val</l><r><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="Jancsi__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="case-prop"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Mari__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="case-prop"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="hideg__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebb</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nagy__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obb</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="boldog__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>abb</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ki/csi__adj">
      <e><p><l>csi</l><r>csi<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sebb</l><r>csi<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="szé/p__adj">
      <e><p><l>p</l><r>p<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bb</l><r>p<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="j/ó__adj">
      <e><p><l>ó</l><r>ó<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obb</l><r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="hol__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/nagyon__adv">
      <e><p><l>nagyon</l><r>nagyon<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jobban</l><r>nagyon<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>legjobban</l><r>nagyon<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="j/ól__adv">
      <e><p><l>ól</l><r>ól<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obban</l><r>ól<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lassa/n__adv">
      <e><p><l>n</l><r>n<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bban</l><r>n<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tegnap__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="/van__vbser">
      <e><p><l>lenni</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>volt</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagyok</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagy</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>van</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagyunk</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagytok</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vannak</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltam</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltál</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>volt</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltunk</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltatok</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltak</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->

    <pardef n="nem__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ház"><i>ház</i><par n="ház__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asztal"><i>asztal</i><par n="ház__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kert"><i>kert</i><par n="kert__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szék"><i>szék</i><par n="kert__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ember"><i>ember</i><par n="kert__n"/></e>
    <e lm="macska"><i>macsk</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kutya"><i>kuty</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fa"><i>f</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="idő"><i>idő</i><par n="idő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="víz"><i>v</i><par n="v/íz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Jancsi"><i>Jancsi</i><par n="Jancsi__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mari"><i>Mari</i><par n="Mari__np"/></e>
    <e lm="nagy"><i>nagy</i><par n="nagy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="boldog"><i>boldog</i><par n="boldog__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hideg"><i>hideg</i><par n="hideg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kicsi"><i>ki</i><par n="ki/csi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kis"><i>kis</i><par n="hideg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="szép"><i>szé</i><par n="szé/p__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jó"><i>j</i><par n="j/ó__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hol"><i>hol</i><par n="hol__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nagyon"><i></i><par n="/nagyon__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lassan"><i>lassa</i><par n="lassa/n__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jól"><i>j</i><par n="j/ól__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tegnap"><i>tegnap</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="is"><i>is</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mindig"><i>mindig</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="együtt"><i>együtt</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="most"><i>most</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><i>ma</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="persze"><i>persze</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nem"><i>nem</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="akkor"><i>akkor</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ott"><i>ott</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aztán"><i>aztán</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="itt"><i>itt</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="van"><i></i><par n="/van__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="nem"><i>nem</i><par n="nem__ij"/></e>
